Hawaii, session 2025, GM1394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that addressing shortages
in the State's public health workforce serves the public
interest and is a key priority for the State. In September
2024, the department of health reported nine hundred vacant
positions, revealing a severe staffing shortage impeding the
State's ability to quickly assess public health issues, develop
effective public health policy, and instill confidence in
residents about Hawaii's ability to protect their health and
well-being.
The legislature further finds that Hawaii is currently
experiencing a comprehensive shortage of skilled, professional
workers. This shortage is driven by a multitude of factors,
including workers relocating to states with lower costs of
living and an aging population wherein experienced workers are
beginning to qualify for retirement. These factors have
resulted in increased competition for skilled workers among
employers across many industry sectors.
2025-2822 SB447 CDl SMA docx
liNiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiMiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
The legislature recognizes that the State faces a wide
range of public health issues stemming from climate change,
increased globalization and global travel, an aging population,
and the complicated effects of mental health issues and
substance abuse. These issues require the State to be
increasingly vigilant to ensure the well-being of its residents.
The legislature further recognizes that section 76-5,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, authorizes the director of human
resources development to delegate the performance of services
under chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the State's civil
service laws, to other agencies. In addition, section 14-1-9,
Hawaii Administrative Rules, authorizes the director of human
resources development to delegate to other departments the
authority to act on human resources matters in accordance with
policies, rules, guidelines, and standards issued by the
director of human resources development. The legislature finds
that if the director of health could take over certain human
resources responsibilities as contemplated under these
provisions, the department of health may be able to more
expeditiously address public health issues facing the State.
2025-2822 SB447 CDl SMA.docx 2

Page 3
S.B. NO. "

C.D. 1
The legislature further finds that under policy number
200.004 of the department of human resources development
policies and procedures, titled establishment of minimum
qualification requirements, the civil service system is based on
the merit principle, which is defined as "the selection of
persons based on their fitness and ability for public employment
and the retention of employees based on their demonstrated
appropriate conduct and productive performance". However, the
minimum qualifications established under this policy, which date
back to December 2003 and are still in effect, do little to
promote the merit principle.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to streamline the
hiring process in the department of health by requiring the
delegation of certain human resources services under chapter 76,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, from the department of human resources
development to the department of health until June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2. (a) There is established a hiring pilot
program within the department of health. The pilot program
shall include the following:
(1) For delegated position classifications, the department
of health may forward to the hiring program
2025-2822 SB447 CDl SMA.docx 3

Page 4
s.B. NO.
C.D. 1
applications received without verifying minimum
qualifications. When the hiring program selects an
applicant for hire, the human resources office of the
department of health shall verify the applicant's
minimum qualifications before extending an offer of
employment. The department of human resources
development shall approve the temporary delegation of
other unique position classifications and non-unique
position classifications that are requested by the
department of health for recruitment under the pilot
program;
(2) The department of health shall have the following
flexibilities regarding minimum qualifications for
positions having a salary range at or below SR-10:
(A) Considering required minimum qualifications as
desired qualifications; and
(B) Allowing certain community college development
programs to be substituted for required or
desired experience;
2025-2822 SB447 CDl SMA.docx

Page 5
S.B. NO. " i
provided that the department of health shall specify
any minimum qualification requirement or substitute in
the recruitment posting;
(3) The department of health may directly hire an
individual who meets minimum qualifications into a
civil service position; provided that there are more
than five vacant positions within the department of
health for that position classification; and
(4) The director of health may make a temporary
appointment outside the list at what would be the
merited civil service pay scale without step
limitation; provided that the department of health
shall notify the department of human resources
development of all temporary appointments outside the
list made under this paragraph. As used in this
paragraph, a "temporary appointment outside the list"
means a non-civil service temporary appointment
outside the list as described in policy number 300.001
of the department of human resources development
policies and procedures, titled types of appointments.
2025-2822 SB447 CDl SMA.docx
innfflHuiiniiiiiniiiBii

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) The pilot program established under subsection (a)
shall be available for department of health recruitments that
are initiated before July 1, 2028.
(c) The department of health shall submit a report to the
legislature of its findings and recommendations, including any
proposed legislation regarding the pilot program established by
this Act, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
the regular sessions of 2026, 2027, 2028, and 2029.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025;
provided that the pilot program established pursuant to this Act
shall be repealed on July 1, 2028.
2025-2822 SB447 CDl SMA.docx 6

S.B. NO. Si
L/.L/. J
APPROVED this 3rd day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B.No. 447, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai'i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai'i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
113

SB No. 447, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives